Massachusetts, session 194th, S3070.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 24N of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended, in line 32, by inserting after the word “24M” the following 
words:- , and to administer chapter 111P.   
SECTION 2. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 111O the 
following chapter:-   
CHAPTER 111P.   
Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings 
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-    
“Covered program”, (a) a child care center, an early education and care program, a family 
child care home, a large family child care home, a public preschool program, or a school-aged 
child care program, as defined in section 1A of chapter 15D; (b) a school, whether public, private 
or charter, that provides education to students in any combination of grade levels from 

of 6 13 kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, and including, but not limited to, any school activity open to 
children who are otherwise instructed in accordance with section 1 of chapter 76; (c) a 
recreational camp; or (d) an institution of higher education, whether public or private.    
“Department”, the department of public health.    
“Immunization”, an inoculation administered for the purpose of making a person resistant 
to an infectious disease.    
“Participant”, a person who engages in 1 or more activities of a covered program through 
enrollment or other registration process.    
“Responsible adult”, a parent or legal guardian of a participant, a participant who is an 
emancipated minor, or a participant who has achieved the age of majority.    
“Schedule”, the schedule of administering routine childhood immunizations, as 
determined by the commissioner, consistent with generally accepted medical practice, scientific 
evidence, and the provisions of section 24N of chapter 111 as amended by sections 26 to 28, 
inclusive, of chapter 73 of the acts of 2025.  
Section 2. To enroll in a covered program, a participant’s records shall include: (a) 
documentation of immunizations in accordance with the schedule; (b) a vaccination exemption; 
provided, that an exemption shall be valid for not more than 1 year; (c) evidence that the 
participant is in the process of obtaining immunizations with the objective of compliance with 
the schedule; or (d) for public schools only, evidence that the participant moved into the 
commonwealth not more than 90 days before the date of enrollment and the responsible adult is 
making a good faith effort to obtain the necessary immunization documentation. A private 

of 6 34 covered program may implement immunization requirements more stringent than those set forth 
in this chapter and chapter 76; provided, however, that the program creates and maintains a 
written immunization policy, which shall be made available to all responsible adults.  
Section 3. A covered program shall annually report to the department total numbers of 
participants, the number of participants who have been immunized, and participants who are 
exempt from immunization requirements to the department, in a standardized digital form and in 
a uniform method determined by the department, and distribute the data to all responsible adults. 
Distribution shall not be required if it would result in disclosure of personal information as 
defined in section 1 of chapter 93H or otherwise violate applicable privacy laws.    
Section 4. The department shall annually publish on its website immunization and 
exemption data for each covered program and school district. The department may also publish 
immunization and exemption data by municipality, county, or other geographic designation, or 
other criteria. Publication shall not be required whenever doing so would result in disclosure of 
personal information as defined in section 1 of chapter 93H or otherwise violate applicable 
privacy laws. The department shall disseminate electronic copies of published data directly to the 
school physician or nurse assigned to any public covered program pursuant to section 53 of 
chapter 71.     
Section 5. (a) A covered program shall be designated as an elevated risk program if 
it: (i) has not achieved herd immunity against a vaccine-preventable disease reflected on the 
schedule; or (ii) fails to report immunization and exemption rates consistent with this chapter. 
Elevated risk program designations shall remain in place until the department, in its sole 
discretion, determines that the vaccine-preventable disease no longer poses a threat of contagion, 

of 6 56 or the covered program has sufficiently improved immunity rates in the covered program 
population. The department shall maintain on its website a list of elevated risk programs.    
(b) The department shall create a notice to responsible adults about an elevated risk 
designation. An elevated risk program shall issue the notice to all responsible adults for 
participants or those seeking enrollment in the program during the period in which the 
designation is in place not more than 10 days after receiving an elevated risk program 
designation. The department may require elevated risk programs to organize and invite all 
responsible adults to a presentation by the department about immunization safety, immunization 
efficacy and herd immunity. Whenever practicable, the presentation shall be conducted within 45 
days of the designation.    
(c) The department shall develop and make available online an informational pamphlet 
about immunization safety and immunization efficacy; provided that the pamphlet shall be 
physically distributed by each elevated risk program to all responsible adults for participants or 
those seeking enrollment in the program during the period in which the designation is in place. 
The pamphlet shall include a statement that refusing to immunize is against state public health 
policy and may result in serious illness or death of the participant or others. 
(d) The commissioner of the department may exclude from an elevated risk program 
participants who are not immunized in accordance with the schedule. Upon the identification of 
an outbreak, potential epidemic or epidemic of a vaccine-preventable disease in a covered 
program or the geographic area encompassing a covered program, the commissioner of the 
department may exclude from such covered program all children who are not immunized against 
that disease. 

of 6 78  Section 6. The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this chapter; 
provided, however, that the department of early education and care, department of elementary 
and secondary education and department of higher education shall promulgate regulations to 
implement application of this chapter to covered programs falling within each department’s 
jurisdiction. Except as otherwise provided herein, no provision of this chapter may be waived by 
a covered program except by express written approval of the department; provided, however, 
that any such waiver shall be valid for not more than one year from the date of issuance.    
Section 7. In conjunction with and as facilitated by the department of early education and 
care, department of elementary and secondary education and department of higher education, as 
well as partnerships with trusted community-based organizations and local public health 
departments, health care providers, or clergy, the department shall conduct outreach to support 
the delivery of medically accurate information about immunizations, including but not limited to 
the availability of programs funded through the Vaccine Purchase Fund established in section 
24N of chapter 111. Such outreach shall focus on, but not be limited to, immunization gap 
populations in under-vaccinated communities. Outreach shall be conducted at least biennially.   
Section 8. The department shall collect and report data on immunizations against any 
infectious disease that has given rise to a declared public health state of emergency in the 
commonwealth. Daily immunization data reports, which the department shall publish on its 
website, shall include the number of individuals receiving the immunization, delineated by age 
and geographic location, including municipal, county and statewide counts. The department shall 
collect infectious disease immunization data by key socioeconomic and demographic indicators, 
including race, gender, ethnicity, disability, sexual orientation and gender identity, primary 
100 language, occupation, household income, residence in elder care facilities and other congregate 

of 6 101 care settings and housing status, and report such data on its website not less than weekly, except 
102 where publication would result in disclosure of personal information as defined in section 1 of 
103 chapter 93H or would otherwise violate applicable privacy laws.   
104  SECTION 3. Section 12F of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
105 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 14 and 15, the words “have come in 
106 contact with” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- be at risk of contracting.    
107  SECTION 4. Said section 12F of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further 
108 amended by inserting after the word “diagnosis”, in line 18, the following word:- , prevention.    
109  SECTION 5. Chapter 5 of the Acts of 1995 is hereby amended by striking out section 
110 122.